Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.115

Denial or revocation of peace or corrections officer certification—Readmission to academy—Reinstatement.

(1) A person denied a certification based upon dismissal or withdrawal from a basic law enforcement academy or basic corrections academy under RCW 43.101.105(3)(a) is eligible for readmission and certification upon meeting standards established in rules of the commission, which rules may provide for probationary terms on readmission.

(2) A person whose certification is denied or revoked based upon prior administrative error of issuance, failure to cooperate, or interference with an investigation is eligible for certification upon meeting standards established in rules of the commission, which rules shall provide for a probationary period of certification in the event of reinstatement of eligibility.

(3) A person whose certification is mandatorily denied or revoked pursuant to RCW 43.101.105(2) is not eligible for certification at any time.

(4) A person whose certification is denied or revoked for reasons other than provided in subsections (1) through (3) of this section may, five years after the revocation or denial, petition the commission for reinstatement of the certificate or for eligibility for reinstatement. The commission may hold a hearing on the petition to consider reinstatement, and the commission may allow reinstatement based upon standards established in rules of the commission. If the certificate is reinstated or eligibility for certification is determined, the commission shall establish a probationary period of certification.

(5) A person whose certification is revoked based solely upon a criminal conviction may petition the commission for reinstatement immediately upon a final judicial reversal of the conviction. The commission shall hold a hearing on request to consider reinstatement, and the commission may allow reinstatement based on standards established in rules of the commission. If the certificate is reinstated or if eligibility for certification is determined, the commission shall establish a probationary period of certification.

(6) The commission's rules and decisions regarding reinstatement shall align with its responsibilities to enhance public trust and confidence in the law enforcement profession and correctional system.

[ 2021 c 323 s 10; 2001 c 167 s 4.]